District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.184

Compliance review reporting requirements.

(a)

The Unit shall submit to the Council, within 60 days of the end of each quarter, the quarterly reports of each agency required by § 2-218.53 and the quarterly reports of each government corporation required by § 2-218.50(f).

(b)

The Unit shall submit to the Council the following:

(1)

A summary of the information that each agency is required to submit pursuant to § 2-218.53 and the information that each government corporation is required to submit pursuant to § 2-218.50(f), in a format that shows the cumulative progress of each agency's or government corporation's annual LSDBE contracting and procurement goals to date, and the actual dollar amount expended with each business enterprise for the current fiscal year; and

(2)

A list of all agencies and government corporations that have not submitted a report for that quarter with a detailed explanation of what actions were taken by the Department of Small and Local Business Development (“Development”) to effectuate compliance with the reporting requirement.

(3)

A summary of the information that each contractor is required by the Auditor, in a format as prescribed by the Auditor; and

(4)

A list of all contractors that have not submitted a report with a detailed explanation of what actions were taken by the Department to effectuate compliance with the reporting requirement.

June 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-176, § 4a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2221(c), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2221(c) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2221(c) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).